New Jersey, session 221, S3255.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this act: Board of Medical Examiners or board means the State Board of Medical Examiners. Laser tattoo removal means the removal of tattoo ink through the application of laser technology. Non-physician means an individual who is not licensed to practice medicine and surgery in this State. b.    The board shall establish requirements to allow a non-physician to obtain certification to perform laser tattoo removal.  The requirements shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1) qualifications of a non-physician to provide tattoo removal services; (2) development or approval of testing; and (3) continuing education for certification renewal. c.     A non-physician shall not offer tattoo removal services without certification. d.    A certification in tattoo removal services is to be renewed on a biennial basis with the board. e.     The board, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to effectuate the purposes of this act. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment, except that the board may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.